Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2665.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Section 13-1103, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-1103. Manslaughter; classification; definition A. A person commits manslaughter by doing any of the following: 1. Recklessly causing the death of another person. 2. Committing second degree murder as prescribed in section 13-1104, subsection A on a sudden quarrel or heat of passion resulting from adequate provocation by the victim. 3. Intentionally providing the physical means that another person uses to die by suicide, with the knowledge that the person intends to die by suicide. 4. Committing second degree murder as prescribed in section 13-1104, subsection A, paragraph 3, while being coerced to do so by the use or threatened immediate use of unlawful deadly physical force on the person or a third person that a reasonable person in his situation would have been unable to resist. 5. Knowingly or recklessly causing the death of an unborn child by any physical injury to the mother. B. A person who is at least eighteen years of age commits manslaughter by intentionally providing advice or encouragement, including by a directed communication, that a minor uses to die by suicide with the knowledge that the minor intends to die by suicide. C. An offense under subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section applies to an unborn child in the womb at any stage of its development.  A person shall not be prosecuted under subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section if any of the following applies: 1. The person was performing an abortion for which the consent of the pregnant woman, or a person authorized by law to act on the pregnant woman's behalf, has been obtained or for which the consent was implied or authorized by law. 2. The person was performing medical treatment on the pregnant woman or the pregnant woman's unborn child. 3. The person was the unborn child's mother. D. Manslaughter is a class 2 felony. E. For the purposes of this section, "directed communication": 1. Means any verbal, written or electronic communication, including through social media posts, text messaging or other online platforms, that is specifically addressed to or reasonably understood to be directed at the minor who dies by suicide. 2. Includes an online post, message or other content that identifies, tags or is otherwise specifically directed at the minor who dies by suicide. 3. Does not include general public commentary, artistic expression or discussion of suicide or mental health that is not specifically directed at the minor who dies by suicide. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Short title This act may be cited as "Cade's Law: If You See Something Say Something". APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.